North Carolina, session 2025, SB207.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-399 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-399. Littering.
(a) No person, including any firm, organization, private corporation, or governing body,
agents or employees of any municipal corporation shall intentionally or recklessly throw, scatter,
spill or place or intentionally or recklessly cause to be blown, scattered, spilled, thrown or placed
or otherwise dispose of any litter upon any public property or private property not owned by the
person within this State or in the waters of this State including any public highway, public park,
lake, river, ocean, beach, campground, forestland, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road,
street or alley except:except in either of the following situations:
(1) When the property is designated by the State or political subdivision thereof
for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use the
property for this purpose; orpurpose.
(2) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that the litter will be prevented from being
carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or
public property or waters.
(a1) No person, including any firm, organization, private corporation, or governing body,
agents, or employees of any municipal corporation shall scatter, spill, or place or cause to be
blown, scattered, spilled, or placed or otherwise dispose of any litter upon any public property or
private property not owned by the person within this State or in the waters of this State including
any public highway, public park, lake, river, ocean, beach, campground, forestland, recreational
area, trailer park, highway, road, street, or alley except:except in either of the following
situations:
(1) When the property is designated by the State or political subdivision thereof
for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use the
property for this purpose; orpurpose.
(2) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that the litter will be prevented from being
carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or
public property or waters.
…
(b1) Any litter found that includes documents or objects clearly bearing the name of a
person, including bank statements, utility bills, bank card bills, medical bills, prescription bottles,
*S207-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and other financial or medical documents or objects, shall create a permissive rebuttable
presumption that the person whose name appears on the document violated subsection (a1) of
this section. Advertising, marketing, and campaign materials and literature shall not be sufficient
to create a rebuttable presumption under this subsection.
…
(e2) If any person violates subsection (a) or (a1) of this section in an amount exceeding 10
pounds or in any quantity for commercial purposes, or discards litter that is a hazardous waste as
defined in G.S. 130A-290, the court shall order the violator to:to do any of the following:
(1) Remove, or render harmless, the litter that he discarded in violation of this
section;section.
(2) Repair or restore property damaged by, or pay damages for any damage
arising out of, his discarding litter in violation of this section; orsection.
(3) Perform community public service relating to the removal of litter discarded
in violation of this section or to the restoration of an area polluted by litter
discarded in violation of this section.
…
(i) For the purpose of the section, unless the context requires otherwise:otherwise, all of
the following definitions apply:
(1) "Aircraft" means a Aircraft. – A motor vehicle or other vehicle that is used or
designed to fly, but does not include a parachute or any other device used
primarily as safety equipment.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 1999-454, s. 1.
(2a) "Commercial purposes" means litter Commercial purposes. – Litter discarded
by a business, corporation, association, partnership, sole proprietorship, or any
other entity conducting business for economic gain, or by an employee or
agent of the entity.
(3) "Law enforcement officer" means any Law enforcement officer. – Any law
enforcement officer sworn and certified pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 17C
or 17E of the General Statutes, except company police officers as defined in
G.S. 74E-6(b)(3). In addition, and solely for the purposes of this section, "law
enforcement officer" means any employee of a county or municipality
designated by the county or municipality as a litter enforcement officer.
(4) "Litter" means any Litter. – Any garbage, rubbish, trash, refuse, can, bottle,
box, container, wrapper, paper, paper product, tire, appliance, mechanical
equipment or part, building or construction material, tool, machinery, wood,
motor vehicle or motor vehicle part, vessel, aircraft, farm machinery or
equipment, sludge from a waste treatment facility, water supply treatment
plant, or air pollution control facility, dead animal, or discarded material in
any form resulting from domestic, industrial, commercial, mining,
agricultural, or governmental operations. While being used for or distributed
in accordance with their intended uses, "litter" does not include political
pamphlets, handbills, religious tracts, newspapers, and other similar printed
materials the unsolicited distribution of which is protected by the Constitution
of the United States or the Constitution of North Carolina.
(5) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as Vehicle. – As defined in G.S. 20-4.01(49).
(6) "Watercraft" means any Watercraft. – Any boat or vessel used for
transportation across the water.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 207-Second Edition